Massachusetts, session 194th, H1961.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 133A of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the words "for whom the court determined that
they shall not be eligible for parole" after the words "at the time of the murder".
SECTION 2. Section 133B of chapter 127 of the General Laws, as so appearing is hereby
amended by striking the words "subsection (e) of" in the final paragraph.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking the words "shall not be eligible for parole pursuant to section 133A of
chapter 127" and inserting in place thereof the following:- "may be eligible for parole after a
term of years fixed by the court pursuant to section 24 of chapter 279; provided that the court
of 2

shall set said term of years at no fewer than 35 years; and provided further, that the court may
determine that the person shall not be eligible for parole".
SECTION 4. Section 24 of chapter 279 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following sentence to the end of the first paragraph:- In the case of a
sentence for murder in the first degree committed by a person on or after the person's eighteenth
birthday, the court either shall set a minimum term which shall be not less than 35 years or shall
determine that the person shall not be eligible for parole.
SECTION 5. Section 25 of chapter 279 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the words "; provided, however, that the court may set parole eligibility at 35
years or greater for a person who would otherwise face a life sentence without eligibility for
parole under the provisions of this section;" after the words "enumerated in clause (i)" and after
the words "person's sentence for good conduct."
SECTION 6. This Act shall apply to persons sentenced after the effective date of this
Act.
of 2